California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(f) A determination by the board that it would not be in the best interest of the state to accept an offer in compromise in satisfaction of a final tax liability shall not be subject to administrative appeal or judicial review.

(g) (1) Offers for liabilities with a fraud or evasion penalty shall
 require a minimum offer of the unpaid tax and fraud or evasion penalty.

(2) The minimum offer may be waived if it can be shown that the taxpayer making the offer was not the person responsible for perpetrating the fraud or evasion. This authorization to waive only applies to partnership accounts where the intent to commit fraud or evasion can be clearly attributed to a partner of the taxpayer.

(h) When an offer in compromise is either accepted or rejected, or the terms and conditions of a compromise agreement are fulfilled, the board shall notify the taxpayer in writing. In the event an offer is rejected, the amount posted will either be applied to the liability or refunded, at the discretion of the taxpayer.

(i) When more than one taxpayer is liable for the debt, such as with spouses or partnerships or other
 business combinations, including, but not limited to, taxpayers who are liable through dual determination or successor’s liability, the acceptance of an offer in compromise from one liable taxpayer shall reduce the amount of the liability of the other taxpayers by the amount of the accepted offer.

(j) Whenever a compromise of tax or penalties or total tax and penalties in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) is approved, there shall be placed on file for at least one year in the office of the board a public record with respect to that compromise. The public record shall include all of the following information:

(1) The name of the taxpayer.

(2) The amount of unpaid tax and related penalties, additions to tax, interest, or other amounts involved.

(3) The amount offered.

(4) A summary of the reason why the compromise is in the best interest of the state.

The public record shall not include any information that relates to any trade secrets, patent, process, style of work, apparatus, business secret, or organizational structure, that if disclosed, would adversely affect the taxpayer or violate the confidentiality provisions of Section 32455. A list shall not be prepared and releases shall not be distributed by the board in connection with these statements.

(k) A compromise made under this section may be rescinded, all compromised liabilities may be reestablished, without regard to any statute of limitations that otherwise may be applicable, and no portion of the amount offered in compromise refunded, if either of the following occurs:

(1) The board determines that a person did any of the following acts regarding the making of the offer:

(A) Concealed from the board property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(B) Received, withheld, destroyed, mutilated, or falsified a book, document, or record, or made a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable for the tax.

(2) The taxpayer fails to comply with any of the terms and conditions relative to the offer.

(l) A person who, in connection with an offer or compromise under this section, or offer of that compromise to enter into that agreement, willfully does either of the following
 shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Conceals from an officer or employee of this state property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(2) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies a book, document, or record, or makes a false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(m) For purposes of this section, “person” means the taxpayer, a member of the taxpayer’s family, a corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or another individual or entity acting on
 behalf of, the taxpayer, or another corporation or entity owned or controlled by the taxpayer, directly or indirectly, or that owns or controls the taxpayer, directly or indirectly.

(n) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2028.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 272, Sec. 8) by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 39.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

32472.

(a) The State Board of Equalization shall release any levy or notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part on any property in the event that the expense of the sale process exceeds the liability for which the levy is made.

(b) (1) (A) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order the release of any levy or
 notice to withhold issued pursuant to this part or, within 90 days from the receipt of funds pursuant to a levy or notice to withhold, order the return of any amount up to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300) of moneys received, upon his or her finding that the levy or notice to withhold threatens the health or welfare of the taxpayer or his or her spouse and dependents or family.

(B) The amount the Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may return to each taxpayer subject to a levy or notice to withhold, is limited to two thousand three hundred dollars ($2,300), or the adjusted amount as specified in paragraph (2), in any monthly period.

(C) The Taxpayers’ Rights Advocate may order amounts returned in the case of a seizure of property as a result of a jeopardy determination, subject to the amounts set or adjusted pursuant to this section and if the ultimate collection of the amount
 due is no longer in jeopardy.

(2) (A) The State Board of Equalization shall adjust the two-thousand-three-hundred-dollar ($2,300) amount specified in paragraph (1) as follows:

(i) On or before March 1, 2016, and on or before March 1 each year thereafter, the State Board of Equalization shall multiply the amount applicable for the current fiscal year by the inflation factor adjustment calculated based on the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index, as recorded by the California Department of Industrial Relations for the most recent year available, and the formula set forth in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 17041. The resulting amount will be the applicable amount for the succeeding fiscal year only when the applicable amount computed is equal to or exceeds a new operative threshold, as defined in subparagraph (B).

(ii) When the applicable amount equals or exceeds an operative threshold specified in subparagraph (B), the resulting applicable amount, rounded to the nearest multiple of one hundred dollars ($100), shall be operative for purposes of paragraph (1) beginning July 1 of the succeeding fiscal year.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “operative threshold” means an amount that exceeds by at least one hundred dollars ($100) the greater of either the amount specified in paragraph (1) or the amount computed pursuant to subparagraph (A) as the operative adjustment to the amount specified in paragraph (1).

(c) The State Board of Equalization shall not sell any seized property until it has first notified the taxpayer in writing of the exemptions from levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9
 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Except as provided in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), this section shall not apply to the seizure of any property as a result of a jeopardy determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 181, Sec. 4.   (SB 1507)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

32472.1.

(a) Except in any case where the board finds collection of the tax to be in jeopardy, if any property has been levied upon, the property or the proceeds from the sale of the property shall be returned to the taxpayer if the board determines any one of the following:

(1) The levy on the property was not in accordance with the law.

(2) The taxpayer has entered into and is in compliance with an installment
 payment agreement pursuant to Section 32389 to satisfy the tax liability for which the levy was imposed, unless that or another agreement allows for the levy.

(3) The return of the property will facilitate the collection of the tax liability or will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(b) Property returned under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) is subject to the provisions of Section 32474.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 929, Sec. 27.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

32473.

Exemptions from levy under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 703.010) of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall be adjusted for purposes of enforcing the collection of debts under this part to reflect changes in the California Consumer Price Index whenever the change is more than 5 percent higher than any previous adjustment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 162.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

32474.

(a) A taxpayer may file a claim with the board for reimbursement of bank charges and any other reasonable third-party check charge fees incurred by the taxpayer as the direct result of an erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action by the board. Bank and third-party charges include a financial institution’s or third party’s customary charge for
 complying with the levy or notice to withhold instructions and reasonable charges for overdrafts that are a direct consequence of the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action. The charges are those paid by the taxpayer and not waived or reimbursed by the financial institution or third party. Each claimant applying for reimbursement shall file a claim with the board that shall be in a form as may be prescribed by the board. In order for the board to grant a claim, the board shall determine that both of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action was caused by board error.

(2) Prior to the erroneous levy or notice to withhold, erroneous processing action, or erroneous collection action, the taxpayer responded to all
 contacts by the board and provided the board with any requested information or documentation sufficient to establish the taxpayer’s position. This provision may be waived by the board for reasonable cause.

(b) Claims pursuant to this section shall be filed within 90 days from the date the bank and third-party charges were incurred by the taxpayer. Within 30 days from the date the claim is received, the board shall respond to the claim. If the board denies the claim, the taxpayer shall be notified in writing of the reason or reasons for the denial of the claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 253, Sec. 4.   (SB 442)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

32475.

(a) At least 30 days prior to the filing or recording of liens under Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) or Chapter 14.5 (commencing with Section 7220) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the board shall mail to the taxpayer a preliminary notice. The notice shall specify the statutory authority of the board for filing or recording the lien, indicate the earliest date on which the lien may be filed or recorded, and state the remedies available to the taxpayer to prevent the filing or recording of the lien. In the
 event tax liens are filed for the same liability in multiple counties, only one preliminary notice shall be sent.

(b) The preliminary notice required by this section shall not apply to jeopardy determinations issued under Article 5 (commencing with Section 32311) of Chapter 6.

(c) If the board determines that filing a lien was in error, it shall mail a release to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien as soon as possible, but no later than seven days, after this determination and receipt of lien recording information. The release shall contain a statement that the lien was filed in error. In the event the erroneous lien is obstructing a lawful transaction, the board shall immediately issue a release of lien to the taxpayer and the entity recording the lien.

(d) When the board releases a lien erroneously
 filed, notice of that fact shall be mailed to the taxpayer and, upon the request of the taxpayer, a copy of the release shall be mailed to the major credit reporting companies in the county where the lien was filed.

(e) The board may release or subordinate a lien if the board determines that the release or subordination will facilitate the collection of the tax liability or will be in the best interest of the state and the taxpayer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 629.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

32476.

(a) If any officer or employee of the board recklessly disregards board-published procedures, a taxpayer aggrieved by that action or omission may bring an action for damages against the State of California in superior court.

(b) In any action brought under subdivision (a), upon finding of liability on the part of the State of California, the state shall be liable to the plaintiff in an amount equal to the sum of all of the following:

(1) Actual and direct monetary damages sustained by the plaintiff as a result of the actions or omissions.

(2) Reasonable litigation costs including any of the following:

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished in connection with any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceeding, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the State of California.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report, test,
 or project that is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of seventy-five dollars ($75) per hour unless the court determines that an increase in the cost of living or a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, justifies a higher rate.

(c) In the awarding of damages under subdivision (b), the court shall take into consideration the negligence or omissions, if any, on the part of the plaintiff which contributed to the damages.

(d) Whenever it appears to the court that the taxpayer’s position in the proceeding brought under subdivision (a) is frivolous, the court may impose a
 penalty against the plaintiff in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000). A penalty so imposed shall be paid upon notice and demand from the board and shall be collected as a tax imposed under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 438, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10. Disposition of Proceeds [32501. - 32502.]

32501.

All taxes, interest, and penalties imposed and all amounts of tax required to be paid to the State under this part shall be paid to the board in the form of remittances payable to the State Board of Equalization of the State of California. The board shall transmit the payments to the State Treasurer to be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32502.

The money in the fund shall, upon order of the Controller, be drawn therefrom for refunds under this part or be transferred to the General Fund of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Violations [32551. - 32557.]

32551.

Any person who knowingly or wilfully files a false tax return with the board, and any person who refuses to permit the board or any of its representatives to make any inspection or examination for which provision is made in this part, or who fails to keep books of account as prescribed by the board, or who fails to preserve such books for the inspection of the board for such time as the board deems necessary, or who alters, cancels, or obliterates entries in such books of account for the purpose of falsifying the records of sales of alcoholic beverages made under this part, is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars
 ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than one month nor more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32552.

Any person who wilfully evades or attempts in any manner to evade or defeat the payment of the excise tax imposed by this part is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32553.

Any person who diverts or conspires with others to divert for beverage use any alcohol or other distilled spirits or wine sold tax free for use in the trades, professions, or industries is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1842.)
-------------------------------------------

32554.

Every person convicted for a violation of any of the provisions of this part for which another penalty or punishment is not specifically provided for in this part is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 374.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

32555.

Every person convicted of a felony for a violation of any of the provisions of this part for which another punishment is not specifically provided for in this part shall be punished by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 578.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

32556.

Any prosecution for violation of any of the penal provisions of this part shall be instituted within three years after the commission of the offense, or within two years after the violation is discovered, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1361, Sec. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

32557.

Any person who knowingly possesses, keeps, stores, or retains for the purpose of sale, or sells or offers to sell, any container or containers of alcoholic beverage with a tax value greater than five hundred dollars ($500) where the taxes imposed under this part have not been paid is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1087, Sec. 47.5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 14.5.  Cannabis Tax [34010. - 34021.5.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions and Definitions [34010. - 34010.]

34010.

(a) This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Cannabis Tax Law.”

(b) For purposes of this part:

(1) “2020–21 fiscal year baseline” means the total amount of funds disbursed in the sub-trust accounts in fiscal year 2021–22 for the third allocation of the fiscal year 2020–21 revenue, pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 34019, as determined by the Department of Finance.

(2) “Arm’s length transaction” shall mean a sale entered into in good faith and for valuable consideration that reflects the fair market value in the open market between two informed
 and willing parties, neither under any compulsion to participate in the transaction.

(3) “Average market price” shall mean both of the following:

(A) (i) In an arm’s length transaction, the average retail price determined by the wholesale cost of the cannabis or cannabis products sold or transferred to a cannabis retailer, plus a mark-up, as determined by the department on a biannual basis in six-month intervals on or before July 1, 2022.

(ii) Notwithstanding clause (i), the department shall not increase the mark-up amount during the period beginning on and after the operative date of the act amending this section by adding this clause and before July 1, 2021.

(B) In a nonarm’s length transaction, the cannabis retailer’s
 gross receipts from the retail sale of the cannabis or cannabis products.

(4) “Cannabis” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 11018 of the Health and Safety Code and shall also mean medicinal cannabis.

(5) “Cannabis products” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 11018.1 of the Health and Safety Code and shall also mean medicinal concentrates and medicinal cannabis products.

(6) “Cannabis flowers” means the dried flowers of the cannabis plant as defined by the department.

(7) “Cannabis leaves” means all parts of the cannabis plant other than cannabis flowers that are sold or consumed.

(8) “Cannabis retailer” means a person required to be licensed pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code as a retailer, non-storefront retailer, microbusiness, or nonprofit, or any other person otherwise authorized under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code to engage in retail sales.

(9) “CBD isolate” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code. 

(10) “Cultivator” means all persons required to be licensed to cultivate cannabis pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(11) “Department” means the California Department of Tax and Fee Administration or its successor agency.

(12) “Designated for donation” means medicinal cannabis donated by a cultivator to a cannabis retailer for subsequent donation to a medicinal cannabis patient pursuant to Section 26071 of the Business and Professions Code.

(13) “Distributor” means a person required to be licensed as a distributor pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section
 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(14) “Enters the commercial market” means cannabis or cannabis products, except for immature cannabis plants and seeds, that complete and comply with a quality assurance review and testing, as described in Section 26110 of the Business and Professions Code.

(15) “Gross receipts” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 6012.

(16) “Manufacturer” means a person required to be licensed as a manufacturer pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code.

(17) “Medicinal cannabis patient” means a qualified patient, as defined in Section 11362.7 of the
 Health and Safety Code, who possesses a physician’s recommendation that complies with Article 25 (commencing with Section 2525) of Chapter 5 of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a qualified patient or primary caregiver for a qualified patient issued a valid identification card pursuant to Section 11362.71 of the Health and Safety Code.

(18) “Microbusiness” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code.

(19) “Nonprofit” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 26070.5 of the Business and Professions Code.

(20) “Person” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 6005.

(21) “Retail sale” has the
 same meaning as set forth in Section 6007.

(22) “Sale” and “purchase” mean any change of title or possession, exchange, or barter, conditional or otherwise, in any manner or by any means whatsoever, for consideration.

(23) “Sub-trust accounts” means the sub-trust accounts created under subdivision (f) of Section 34019.

(24) “Synthetic cannabinoid” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 26001 of the Business and Professions Code.

(25) “Tax fund” means the California Cannabis Tax Fund created by Section 34018.

(26) “Transfer” means to grant, convey, hand over, assign, sell, exchange, or
 barter, in any manner or by any means, with or without consideration.

(27) “Unprocessed cannabis” includes cannabis flowers, cannabis leaves, or other categories of harvested cannabis, categories for unprocessed or frozen cannabis or immature plants, or cannabis that is shipped directly to manufacturers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 248, Sec. 48.   (AB 8)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Cannabis Taxes [34011. - 34012.5.]

34011.

(a) (1) Effective on and after January 1, 2018, and before January 1, 2023, a cannabis excise tax shall be imposed upon purchasers of cannabis or cannabis products sold in this state at the rate of 15 percent of the average market price of any retail sale by a cannabis retailer. A purchaser’s liability for the cannabis excise tax is not extinguished until the cannabis excise tax has been paid to this state except that an invoice, receipt, or other document from a cannabis retailer given to the purchaser pursuant to this subdivision is sufficient to relieve the purchaser from further liability for
 the tax to which the invoice, receipt, or other document refers.

(2) Each cannabis retailer shall provide a purchaser with an invoice, receipt, or other document that includes a statement that reads: “The cannabis excise taxes are included in the total amount of this invoice.”

(3) The department may prescribe other means to display the cannabis excise tax on an invoice, receipt, or other document from a cannabis retailer given to the purchaser.

(b) (1) A distributor in an arm’s length transaction shall collect the cannabis excise tax imposed by this section from the cannabis retailer on or before 90 days after the sale or transfer of cannabis or cannabis product to the cannabis retailer. A
 distributor in a nonarm’s length transaction shall collect the cannabis excise tax from the cannabis retailer on or before 90 days after the sale or transfer of cannabis or cannabis product to the cannabis retailer, or at the time of retail sale by the cannabis retailer, whichever is earlier. A distributor shall report and remit the cannabis excise tax to the department pursuant to Section 34015. A cannabis retailer shall be responsible for collecting the cannabis excise tax from the purchaser and remitting the cannabis excise tax to the distributor in accordance with rules and procedures established under law and any regulations adopted by the department.

(2) A distributor shall provide an invoice, receipt, or other similar document to the cannabis retailer that identifies the licensee receiving the product, the distributor from which the product originates, including the associated unique identifier, the amount of cannabis excise tax, and any
 other information deemed necessary by the department. The department may authorize other forms of documentation under this paragraph.

(c) The
 cannabis excise tax imposed by this section shall be in addition to the sales and use tax imposed by the state and local governments.

(d) Gross receipts from the sale of cannabis or cannabis products for purposes of assessing the sales and use taxes under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) shall include the tax levied pursuant to this section.

(e) Cannabis or cannabis products shall not be sold to a purchaser unless the
 cannabis excise tax imposed by this section has been paid by the purchaser at the time of sale.

(f) This section shall not be construed to impose a cannabis excise tax upon medicinal cannabis, or medicinal cannabis product, donated for no consideration to a medicinal cannabis patient pursuant to Section 26071 of the Business and Professions Code.

(g) (1) This section shall not be construed to impose
 a cannabis excise tax upon cannabis or cannabis products designated as a trade sample pursuant to Section 26153.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) A person licensed under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code that sells cannabis or cannabis products designated as a trade sample pursuant to Section 26153.1 of the Business and Professions Code shall be liable for the cannabis excise tax imposed by this section as if the person were a cannabis retailer at the time of sale.

(h) This section shall be inoperative on April 1, 2023.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 19.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Inoperative April 1, 2023, by its own provisions.  Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 41.  \n\n   Repealed conditionally as prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 41.     See later operative version as amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70.   Note: This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

34011.

(a) (1) Effective January 1, 2018, a cannabis excise tax shall be imposed upon purchasers of cannabis or cannabis products sold in this state at the rate of 15 percent of the average market price of any retail sale by a cannabis retailer. A purchaser’s liability for the cannabis excise tax is not extinguished until the cannabis excise tax has been paid to this state except that an invoice, receipt, or other document from a cannabis retailer given to the purchaser pursuant to this subdivision is sufficient to relieve the purchaser from further liability for the tax to which the invoice, receipt, or other document refers.

(2) Each cannabis retailer shall provide a purchaser with an invoice, receipt, or other document that includes a statement
 that reads: “The cannabis excise taxes are included in the total amount of this invoice.”

(3) The department may prescribe other means to display the cannabis excise tax on an invoice, receipt, or other document from a cannabis retailer given to the purchaser.

(b) (1) A distributor in an arm’s length transaction shall collect the cannabis excise tax from the cannabis retailer on or before 90 days after the sale or transfer of cannabis or cannabis product to the cannabis retailer. A distributor in a nonarm’s length transaction shall collect the cannabis excise tax from the cannabis retailer on or before 90 days after the sale or transfer of cannabis or cannabis product to the cannabis retailer, or at the time of retail sale by the cannabis retailer, whichever is earlier. A distributor shall report and remit the cannabis excise tax to the department pursuant to
 Section 34015. A cannabis retailer shall be responsible for collecting the cannabis excise tax from the purchaser and remitting the cannabis excise tax to the distributor in accordance with rules and procedures established under law and any regulations adopted by the department.

(2) A distributor shall provide an invoice, receipt, or other similar document to the cannabis retailer that identifies the licensee receiving the product, the distributor from which the product originates, including the associated unique identifier, the amount of cannabis excise tax, and any other information deemed necessary by the department. The department may authorize other forms of documentation under this paragraph.

(c) The excise tax imposed by this section shall be in addition to the sales and use tax imposed by the state and local governments.

(d) Gross receipts from the sale of cannabis or cannabis products for purposes of assessing the sales and use taxes under Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) shall include the tax levied pursuant to this section.

(e) Cannabis or cannabis products shall not be sold to a purchaser unless the excise tax required by law has been paid by the purchaser at the time of sale.

(f) The sales and use taxes imposed by Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) shall not apply to retail sales of medicinal cannabis, medicinal cannabis concentrate, edible medicinal cannabis products, or topical cannabis as those terms are defined in Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code when a qualified patient or primary caregiver for a qualified patient provides their card issued under Section 11362.71 of the Health and Safety Code and a valid
 government-issued identification card.

(g) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose an excise tax upon medicinal cannabis, or medicinal cannabis product, donated for no consideration to a medicinal cannabis patient pursuant to Section 26071 of the Business and Professions Code.

(h) (1) Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose an excise tax upon cannabis or cannabis products designated as a trade sample pursuant to Section 26153.1 of the Business and Professions Code.

(2) A person licensed under Division 10 (commencing with Section 26000) of the Business and Professions Code that sells cannabis or cannabis products designated as a trade sample pursuant to Section 26153.1 of the Business and
 Professions Code shall be liable for the excise tax imposed by this section as if the person were a cannabis retailer at the time of sale.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 112.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.   Note: Pursuant to conditions prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 41, this version would resume operation, by reversion, on the inoperative date of the amendment by Stats. 2022,  Ch. 56.  This section was added on Nov. 8, 2016, by initiative Prop. 64.)
-------------------------------------------

34011.01.

(a) Any amount owed by a cannabis retailer to a distributor in connection with the collection of cannabis excise tax owed prior to January 1, 2023, shall be paid by the retailer to the distributor on or before April 1, 2023. This section shall not be construed to require the department to enforce this obligation.

(b) A cannabis retailer may claim a credit on the cannabis excise tax return for cannabis excise tax amounts paid to a distributor, pursuant to Section 34011, before January 1, 2023, on cannabis or cannabis products sold to a purchaser on or after January 1, 2023, for which the cannabis retailer is responsible for remitting to the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 20.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

34011.1.

(a) (1) Until December 31, 2025, a licensed cannabis retailer that has received approval from the Department of Cannabis Control for a fee waiver under Section 26249 of the Business and Professions Code may retain vender compensation in an amount equal to 20 percent of the cannabis excise tax. For purposes of this paragraph, approval for a fee waiver under Section 26249 includes approval for a fee waiver that is contingent upon the availability of funds.

(2) To apply to retain vendor compensation pursuant to this section, a cannabis retailer shall complete a one-page application in a form and manner prescribed by the department that sets forth the name under which they transact or intend to transact business, the location of their place or
 places of business, and any other information the department may require. The cannabis retailer shall also include with the application their seller’s permit number and cannabis tax permit number and a copy of their cannabis license and Department of Cannabis Control approved fee waiver. An application for a permit shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by the department.

(3) Upon verification that a licensed cannabis retailer meets the requirements of this subdivision, the department shall issue the cannabis retailer a notice approving vendor compensation under this section.

(4) To maintain eligibility for vendor compensation under this section, a licensed cannabis retailer shall maintain eligibility for a fee waiver under Section 26249 of the Business and Professions Code and any relevant implementing regulations. An approval for vendor
 compensation under this section shall expire on the last day of the calendar quarter following notification to the department pursuant to paragraph (5) that a cannabis retailer is no longer eligible for a fee waiver. If a cannabis retailer maintains eligibility for a fee waiver, an approval for vendor compensation under this subdivision shall remain valid for one year commencing on the first day of the calendar quarter following the date the department issues the notice, and may be renewed pursuant to paragraph (2) or other procedures as may be prescribed by the department.

(5) To notify the department of a cannabis retailer’s eligibility for vendor compensation under this section, the Department of Cannabis Control shall do either of the following:

(A) Maintain a database accessible to the department reflecting whether a cannabis retailer is eligible or has become ineligible for
 a fee waiver under Section 26249 of the Business and Professions Code and implementing regulations.

(B) Otherwise provide information upon request of the department for purposes of verifying a cannabis retailer’s eligibility under this section.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2023.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 21.   (AB 195)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 41.  \n   Repealed conditionally as prescribed by Stats. 2022, Ch. 56, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

34011.2.

(a) (1) Effective on and after January 1, 2023, a cannabis excise tax shall be imposed upon purchasers of cannabis or cannabis products sold in this state at 15 percent of the gross receipts of any retail sale by a cannabis retailer.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), on and after July 1, 2025, and before October 1, 2025, the cannabis excise tax rate imposed in paragraph (1) shall be 19 percent of the gross receipts of any retail sale by a cannabis retailer as determined by the department, in consultation with the Department of Finance, pursuant to this section, as added by Section 22 of Chapter 56 of the Statutes of 2022.
